Rhode Island, session 2025, SB599.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-1-26 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-1 entitled "Public Utilities
Commission" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-1-26. Public utilities reserve fund created — Appropriations — Recovery of
expenses from utility companies.
(a) There is hereby created a fund to be known as the public utilities reserve account, an
account within the public utilities commission in the general fund. Such account, hereinafter
referred to as the “fund,” shall be used for the purpose of providing the financial means for the
commission and division to purchase materials, and to employ on a contract or other basis, legal
counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants, economists, and other expert witnesses, and
for other necessary expenses of the commission and division in investigations and hearings related
to applications and filings made by public utilities, or commission- or division-initiated
investigations into utility operating practices, or related appeals to state or federal courts or in
relevant regulatory matters before federal agencies. The general assembly shall annually
appropriate to the fund a sum equal to twenty-five one thousandths of one percent (.00025%) of
the gross, annual operating revenues of gas, electric, and telephone companies attributable to their
conduct of intrastate operations in this state during the year next preceding; provided, however, that
if at June 30, in any year the balance in the fund shall be in excess of one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), the amount of the excess shall forthwith be transferred to the general fund of the state.
Prebilled revenue shall be excluded from an excess balance to be transferred to the general fund.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer
for the payment from the fund of such sums as may be required from time to time upon receipt by
him or her of proper vouchers approved by the administrator.
(b) The public utility making an application or filing to the commission or division, or
subject to a commission- or division-initiated investigation, or any public utility distributing
electricity or gas whose retail rates would be affected by a proceeding before an agency of the
federal government or a federal court, shall be charged with and shall pay a portion of the expenses
reasonably so incurred by the commission and by the division for the purchase of materials and for
the employment of legal counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants, and expert
witnesses, and for travel and other necessary expenses as are reasonably attributable to the
investigation or the hearing of the proposal by the commission and the division, or to the
administrator’s representation of the state before federal or state courts or an agency of the federal
government. The administrator or the commission chairperson, as appropriate, shall ascertain the
expenses and shall determine the amount to be paid by the public utility company or companies,
and bills shall be rendered therefor either at the conclusion of the investigation or hearing, or from
time to time during its progress, and the amount of each bill so rendered shall be paid by the public
utility to the administrator or the commission, as appropriate, within thirty (30) days from the date
of its rendition unless, within the thirty-day (30) time period, the public utility so billed shall request
an opportunity to be heard by the commission as to the amount thereof. The commission shall
comply with any such request. Any amount of the bill not paid within thirty (30) days from the date
of service of the determination upon the hearing, or, if none shall be requested, within thirty (30)
days from the date of rendition of the bill, shall draw interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%)
per annum. At the discretion of the administrator, or the commission chairperson, as appropriate,
utility companies may be prebilled for contractual services utilized by the commission or division.
Any revenue received from public utilities not expended upon the completion of the case will be
promptly reimbursed to the utility company. The total amount that may be charged to any public
utility under authority of this section for proceedings before the commission or division or in related
appeals before state or federal courts in any calendar year shall not exceed seven hundred and fifty
thousand dollars ($750,000), provided that any indirect one million dollars ($1,000,000). Indirect
cost recovery obligations pursuant to § 35-4-27 shall constitute a separate and additional assessment
to public utilities to be added to the foregoing expense assessment limit limits; in addition, the total
amount that may be charged against any public utility under authority of this section for the
administrator’s representation of the state before agencies of the federal government in any calendar
year shall not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) five hundred thousand
LC001349 - Page 2 of 4

dollars ($500,000). All moneys collected by the administrator or the commission pursuant to this
section shall be paid by him or her monthly to the general treasurer to be added to the public utilities
reserve fund.
(c) The division of public utilities and carriers shall adopt by regulation, a fee schedule for
all telecommunications filings, including initial applications and annual registrations, by
telecommunications providers that are not otherwise subject to the provisions of subsection (a) or
(b) of this section. The money assessed and paid shall be paid into the general fund and shall not
be a part of the public utilities reserve fund.
(d) The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary
for the salaries of the commissioners and their expenses incurred in the performance of their duties,
and for the operations of the commission and the division and payment of such office expenses and
assistance as from time to time may be required. The state controller is authorized and directed to
draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum, or so much thereof,
as may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of vouchers approved by the
administrator or his or her authorized agent.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001349
========
LC001349 - Page 3 of 4